District of Columbia statutes.
21-2062

Petitions for orders subsequent to appointment.

(a)

Any person interested in the welfare of an individual for whom a conservator has been appointed may petition the court for an order:

(1)

Requiring bond, additional bond, or reducing bond;

(2)

Requiring a special accounting for the administration of the trust;

(3)

Directing distribution;

(4)

Removing the conservator and appointing a temporary or successor conservator; or

(5)

Granting other appropriate relief.

(b)

A conservator may petition the court for instructions concerning fiduciary responsibility.

(c)

Upon notice and hearing, the court may give appropriate instructions or make any appropriate order.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2062.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-315 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).